Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 5 Bills of Peace

23-3-110.
Bill of peace; when entertained; ancillary injunction.

It being the interest of this state that there shall be an end of litigation, equity will entertain a bill of peace:

To confirm some right which has been previously satisfactorily established by more than one legal trial and is likely to be litigated again;

To avoid a multiplicity of actions by establishing a right, in favor of or against several persons, which is likely to be the subject of legal controversy; or

In other similar cases.

As ancillary to this jurisdiction, equity will grant perpetual injunctions.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 3154, 3155; Code 1868, §§ 3166, 3167; Code 1873, §§ 3233, 3234; Code 1882, §§ 3233, 3234; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4894, 4895; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5469, 5470; Code 1933, §§ 37-1501, 37-1502.

Law reviews.

For article discussing aspects of third-party practice (impleader) under the Georgia Civil Practice Act, see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 355 (1968).